New York, session 2025-2026, A8914.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 2 of subdivision b of section 12-126 of the 2 administrative code of the city of New York is amended by adding a new 3 subparagraph (v) to read as follows: 4 (v) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, where 5 an active or retired member of the police department dies by suicide and 6 is enrolled in a health insurance plan, the surviving spouse or domestic 7 partner and any other dependents shall be afforded the right to such 8 health insurance coverage and health insurance coverage which is predi- 9 cated on the insured's enrollment in the hospital and medical program 10 for the aged and disabled under the social security act as is provided 11 for retirees and their dependents as set forth in subparagraph (i) of 12 this paragraph, for ninety days following such death. 13 § 2. Section 165 of the civil service law is amended by adding a new 14 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 15 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in the 16 event of death by suicide of an active or retired police officer having 17 coverage at the time of death for such police officer and such police 18 officer's dependents, the unremarried spouse of such police officer 19 covered at the time of such police officer's death and such police offi- 20 cer's covered dependents shall be eligible to continue full coverage 21 under the health benefit plan for ninety days after such police offi- 22 cer's death. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13337-01-5 A. 8914 2 1 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 161-a of the civil service law, as added 2 by chapter 307 of the laws of 1979, is amended to read as follows: 3 2. Insofar as the provisions of this section are inconsistent with any 4 other act, general or special, or any rule or regulation adopted there- 5 under, the provisions of this section shall be controlling and insofar 6 as the regulations promulgated by the president pursuant to subdivision 7 one of this section are inconsistent with any rule or regulation, the 8 provisions of such regulations shall be controlling; provided, however, 9 that insofar as the regulations promulgated by the president pursuant to 10 subdivision one of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of 11 subparagraph (v) of paragraph two of subdivision b of section 12-126 of 12 the administrative code of the city of New York or subdivision three of 13 section one hundred sixty-five of this article, such provisions shall be 14 controlling. 15 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.